California, session 20252026, AB300.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51178 of the Government Code is amended to read:51178. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall identify areas in the state as moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones based on consistent statewide criteria and based on the severity of fire hazard that is expected to prevail in those areas. Moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones shall be based on fuel loading, slope, fire weather, and other relevant factors including areas where winds have been identified by the Office of the State Fire Marshal as a major cause of wildfire spread.(b) At least once every eight five years, the State Fire Marshal shall re-review areas in the state that are not identified as moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones and, if applicable, identify those areas pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 2. Section 51181 of the Government Code is amended to read:51181. At least once every eight five years, the State Fire Marshal shall review the areas in the state identified as very high fire hazard severity zones pursuant to this chapter, and as necessary, shall make recommendations relative to very high fire hazard severity zones. This review shall coincide with the review of state responsibility area lands every eight five years and, when possible, fall within the time frames for each county’s general plan update. Any revision of areas included in a very high fire hazard severity zone shall be made in accordance with Sections 51178 and 51179.SEC. 3. Section 4202 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4202. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall classify lands within state responsibility areas into fire hazard severity zones. Each zone shall embrace relatively homogeneous lands and shall be based on fuel loading, slope, fire weather, and other relevant factors present, including areas where winds have been identified by the department as a major cause of wildfire spread.(b) At least once every eight five years, the State Fire Marshal shall re-review lands within state responsibility areas that are not classified into fire hazard severity zones and, if applicable, classify those areas pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 4. Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4204. At least once every eight five years, the State Fire Marshal shall review zones designated and rated pursuant to this article and, as necessary, shall revise zones or their ratings or repeal the designation of zones. Any revision of a zone or its rating or any repeal of a zone shall conform to the requirements of Section 4203. In addition, the revision or repeal of a zone may be petitioned pursuant to Sections 11340.6 and 11340.7 of the Government Code.